test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_cokkad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - čokkáđ: # ok, MLO
    čokkáđ+V+Inf: čokkáđ
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokkáám 
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čokkááh
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čokkáá
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čokkájeen
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čokkáávettee
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čokkáv
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čokkáp
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čokkáávetteđ
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čokkájeh
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čokkájim
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čokkájih
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čokkái
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čokkáim
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čokkáid
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čokkáin
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čokkáim
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čokkáid
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čokkájii    
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: čokkááččim
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: čokkááččih
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: čokkááččij
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: čokkááččáim
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: čokkááččáid
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: čokkááččáin
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: čokkááččijm
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: čokkááččijd
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čokkááččii
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: čokkáážeem
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: čokkáážeeh
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: čokkáš            # čokkáž
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: čokkáážeen
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: čokkášvettee      # čokkážvettee
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: čokkáážává
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: čokkáážep
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: čokkášvetteđ      # čokkážvetteđ
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čokkáážeh

    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čokkáá
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čokkájus
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čokkájoon
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čokkájee
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čokkájus
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čokkájop
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čokkáđ
    čokkáđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čokkájus
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čokkáá
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čokkám
    čokkáđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: čokkááččii
    čokkáđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:  čokkáážii
    čokkáđ+V+PrsPrc: [čokkájeijee, čokkájijjee]
    čokkáđ+V+PrfPrc: čokkám
    čokkáđ+V+Actio+Nom: čokkám
    čokkáđ+V+Actio+Ess: čokkáámin
    čokkáđ+V+Actio+Loc: čokkáámist
    čokkáđ+V+Actio+Ill: čokkáámân
    čokkáđ+V+Actio+Com: čokkáádijn
    čokkáđ+V+VAbess: čokkááhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - sáhháđ: # ok, MLO
    sáhháđ+V+Inf: sáhháđ
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sáhháám
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sáhhááh
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sáhháá
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: sáhhájeen
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: sáhháávettee
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: sáhháv
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sáhháp
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sáhháávetteđ
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sáhhájeh
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sáhhájim
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sáhhájih
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sáhhái
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: sáhháim
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: sáhháid
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: sáhháin
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sáhháim
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sáhháid
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sáhhájii
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: sáhhááččim
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: sáhhááččih
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: sáhhááččij
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: sáhhááččáim
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: sáhhááččáid
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: sáhhááččáin
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: sáhhááččijm
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: sáhhááččijd
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: sáhhááččii
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: sáhháážeem
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: sáhháážeeh
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: sáhháš            # sáhháž
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: sáhháážeen
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: sáhhášvettee      # sáhhážvettee
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: sáhháážává
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: sáhháážep
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: sáhhášvetteđ      # sáhhážvetteđ
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: sáhháážeh

    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: sáhháá
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: sáhhájus
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Du1: sáhhájoon
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Du2: sáhhájee
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Du3: sáhhájus
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: sáhhájop
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sáhháđ
    sáhháđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: sáhhájus
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: sáhháá
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: sáhhám
    sáhháđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: sáhhááččii
    sáhháđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: sáhháážii 
    sáhháđ+V+PrsPrc: [sáhhájeijee, sáhhájijjee]
    sáhháđ+V+PrfPrc: sáhhám
    sáhháđ+V+Actio+Nom: sáhhám
    sáhháđ+V+Actio+Ess: sáhháámin
    sáhháđ+V+Actio+Loc: sáhháámist
    sáhháđ+V+Actio+Ill: sáhháámân
    sáhháđ+V+Actio+Com: sáhháádijn
    sáhháđ+V+VAbess: sáhhááhánnáá
    
    
    
